Indiana, session 2026, HB1102.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-35-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 15. Access to Services by Licensed or Board Certified
Behavior Analysts
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a public school, including a
charter school.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "licensed or board certified
behavior analyst" means a behavior analyst with credentialing as
a licensed or board certified:
(1) behavior analyst doctoral; or
(2) behavior analyst.
Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to a student to whom the
following applies:
(1) The student:
(A) is receiving applied behavioral analysis therapy
services from a licensed or board certified behavior
HB 1102—LS 6549/DI 110


analyst; and
(B) has recently enrolled in a public school.
(2) The provision of applied behavioral analysis therapy
services are included as part of the student's:
(A) individualized education program; or
(B) plan developed under Section 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(b) Upon request by the parent of the student or the student, if
the student is an adult or emancipated minor, a public school shall
do the following:
(1) Consult with a licensed or board certified behavior analyst
described in subsection (a)(1)(A) regarding the provision of
applied behavioral analysis therapy services for the student.
(2) Allow:
(A) the licensed or board certified behavior analyst
described in subdivision (1); and
(B) as applicable, a certified registered behavior technician
who works with the analyst described in clause (A);
to provide behavioral analysis therapy services that are
within the scope of the analyst's or technician's scope of
practice as established by the Behavior Analyst Certification
Board to the student at the public school for not less than
thirty (30) days and, unless otherwise recommended by the
licensed or board certified behavior analyst, not more than
ninety (90) days after the date the student begins attending the
public school.
(c) The presence or participation of a licensed or board certified
behavior analyst under this section is not a designation of a service
provider for purposes of 511 IAC 7 or the federal Individual with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA).
(d) An individualized education program is not required to
identify an individual licensed or board certified behavior analyst
by name.
(e) Nothing in this section may be construed to restrict or limit
a public school from allowing an analyst or technician described in
subsection (b)(2) to provide behavioral analysis therapy services to
a student beyond the ninety (90) day period described in subsection
(b)(2).
(f) A:
(1) licensed or board certified behavior analyst; or
(2) certified registered behavior technician described in
subsection (b)(2);
HB 1102—LS 6549/DI 110


may not provide applied behavioral analysis therapy services in a
public school under this chapter virtually or through telehealth (as
defined in IC 25-1-9.5-6). The provision of applied behavioral
analysis therapy services in a public school under this chapter must
be provided in person.
Sec. 4. (a) Before an analyst or technician described in section
3(b) of this chapter provides behavioral analysis therapy services
in a public school under this chapter, the public school shall do the
following:
(1) Unless the public school receives results under subdivision
(2), conduct an expanded criminal history check and
expanded child protection index check as described in
IC 20-26-5-10 of the analyst or technician.
(2) Accept the results of an expanded criminal history check
and expanded child protection index check that was
conducted within the immediately preceding five (5) years if
the results are provided to the public school by the analyst or
technician.
(b) An analyst or technician described in section 3(b) of this
chapter is responsible for all costs associated with obtaining the
expanded criminal history check and expanded child protection
index check unless the public school agrees to pay the costs.
Sec. 5. A public school may not allow an analyst or technician
described in section 3(b) of this chapter to provide applied
behavioral analysis therapy services under this chapter if:
(1) the analyst or technician has been convicted of an offense
listed in IC 20-28-5-8(c) or described in IC 20-28-5-8(d); and
(2) the conviction has not been reversed, vacated, or set aside
on appeal.
Sec. 6. A school corporation, a public school, and school
personnel are immune from civil liability for any actions taken in
good faith to comply with this chapter. The civil immunity under
this section does not apply to an act or omission that constitutes
gross negligence or willful, wanton, or intentional misconduct.
Sec. 7. Not later than September 1, 2026, the department shall
prepare and provide to public schools information and guidance to
assist public schools in implementing this chapter.
Sec. 8. Applied behavioral analysis therapy services delivered by
a licensed or board certified behavior analyst or registered
behavior technician under this chapter retain their
characterization as clinical or therapeutic services for purposes of
insurance or third party reimbursement.
HB 1102—LS 6549/DI 110


Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a
public school to employ, contract with, or pay a licensed or board
certified behavior analyst or registered behavior technician who
provides applied behavioral analysis therapy services under this
chapter. The cost of services delivered by an outside licensed or
board certified behavior analyst or registered behavior technician
remains the responsibility of the parent or the parent's insurer
unless the public school voluntarily agrees to pay.
SECTION 2. IC 34-30-2.1-286.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 286.5. IC 20-35-15-6 (Concerning
the provision of applied behavioral analysis therapy services in
public schools).
HB 1102—LS 6549/DI 110


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Education, to which was referred
House Bill 1102, has had the same under consideration and begs leave
to report the same back to the House with the recommendation that said
bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1102 as introduced.)
BEHNING
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1102 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, between lines 38 and 39, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(f) A:
(1) licensed or board certified behavior analyst; or
(2) certified registered behavior technician described in
subsection (b)(2);
may not provide applied behavioral analysis therapy services in a
public school under this chapter virtually or through telehealth (as
defined in IC 25-1-9.5-6). The provision of applied behavioral
analysis therapy services in a public school under this chapter must
be provided in person.".
(Reference is to HB 1102 as printed January 15, 2026.)
GREENE
HB 1102—LS 6549/DI 110